California, session 20252026, SB1146.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 651.4 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:651.4. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(2)“Creates” includes causing a video or audio media to be created through prompts to a generative artificial intelligence system.(3)“Digital replica” has the same meaning as in Section 3344.1 of the Civil Code. (4)(A)“Generated or substantially altered using artificial intelligence or other computer technology” means when visual or audio media of a natural person is either of the following:(i)Entirely generated using artificial intelligence or other computer technology and would appear to a reasonable person to be authentic.(ii)Materially altered by artificial intelligence or other computer technology and that alteration would cause a reasonable person to have a fundamentally different understanding of the altered media when comparing it to an unaltered version.(B)A visual or audio media of a natural person is not “generated or substantially altered using artificial intelligence or other computer technology” if the media is immaterially altered by artificial intelligence or other computer technology, including a cosmetic adjustment, color edit, cropped image, or resized image.(2) “Clear and conspicuous disclosure” means a disclosure that is difficult to miss, easily understandable, and presented in a manner that a reasonable consumer would notice, read, and comprehend, taking into account the medium, format, and context in which the advertisement appears. (3) (A) “Digital replica” means a computer-generated, highly realistic electronic representation that is readily identifiable as the voice or visual likeness of an individual that is embodied in a sound recording, image, audiovisual work, or transmission in which the actual individual either did not actually perform or appear, or the actual individual did perform or appear, but the fundamental character of the performance or appearance has been materially altered.(B) “Digital replica” does not include the electronic reproduction, use of a sample of one sound recording or audiovisual work into another, remixing, mastering, or digital remastering of a sound recording or audiovisual work authorized by the copyrightholder.(4) “Generative artificial intelligence” means an artificial intelligence system that can generate derived synthetic content, such as text, images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of the artificial intelligence system’s training data.(5) “Health-related consumer product or service” means a product or service that is marketed for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, and is marketed as having a health benefit. Examples include, but are not limited to, dietary supplements and medical and dental goods and services.(6) “Health care provider” means a person licensed under this division. (7)“Natural person” means a natural human individual, and does not include a firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or cooperative association. (8)(7) “Synthetic performer” means a humanlike digital figure, voice, or representation created in whole or in part using generative artificial intelligence, machine learning, or computational techniques, and not based on, derived from, or intended to depict any particular identifiable natural person as described in Section 3344 of the Civil Code. that creates the realistic impression of an audiovisual or visual performance of a human performer who is not recognizable as any identifiable natural person.(b) A person who creates or causes to be created an advertisement that includes the image, audio, or video of a digital replica or synthetic performer depicted as a health care provider that is generated or substantially altered using artificial intelligence or other computer technology to promote the sale of a health-related consumer product or service shall include a clear and conspicuous disclosure that the image, audio, or video, as applicable, of the person health care provider depicted in the advertisement was generated or substantially altered by artificial intelligence and or that no human health care provider is depicted, and shall comply with all of the following: depicted.(1)For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall appear in a prominent location and in a size that is easily readable by the average viewer. For visual media that is video, that disclosure shall be displayed for the duration of the video.(2)For audio-only media, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily heard by the average listener, at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the audio, and, if the audio is greater than two minutes in length, interspersed within the audio at intervals of not greater than two minutes each.(c) Advertisements subject to this section shall comply with all other applicable state and federal laws. This section does not abrogate, narrow, or otherwise limit any other applicable state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17500) of Part 3 of Division 7. This section does not authorize use of a person’s likeness digital replica for commercial purposes without the individual’s consent.(d)(1)The Attorney General or any district attorney may bring a civil action to enforce subdivision (b) and may seek any appropriate remedy, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief.(d) (1) A violation of this section constitutes a violation of Section 17500 and may be enforced pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2.(2) A natural person whose digital replica is used in an advertisement that violates subdivision (b) may bring a civil action against the person who created the advertisement and may seek any appropriate remedy, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief.(3) The remedies provided for under this paragraph are cumulative and shall be in addition to any other remedies provided for by law, including, but not limited to, Section 3344 of the Civil Code. (4) A violation of this section shall not constitute a misdemeanor for purposes of this article.(5)This section does not alter or negate any rights, obligations, or immunities of an interactive computer service provider under Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code.(e)This section does not apply to an advertisement that uses a digital replica depicted as a health care provider that is generated or substantially altered using artificial intelligence or other computer technology to promote the sale of a health-related consumer product or service if all of the following conditions are met:(1)The natural person whose digital replica is used in the advertisement is a health care provider.(2)The digital replica in the advertisement is depicted as being licensed in the same profession as the natural person.(3)The natural person has provided prior consent to the use of their digital replica in the advertisement.(4)The natural person agrees with all of the statements made in the advertisement by the digital replica generated or substantially altered by artificial intelligence.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________